District of Columbia statutes.
7-1911

Waiver of privilege.

Any professional covered by the privilege established in § 14-307, who has or had as his or her client or patient the adult alleged or determined to be in need of protective services may be required, without the consent of that adult or his or her legal representative, to testify or otherwise disclose confidential information in any court proceeding held pursuant to this chapter if the judge determines that the privilege should be waived in the interest of justice.

History

Mar. 14, 1985, D.C. Law 5-156, § 12, 32 DCR 13

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-2511.

Editor's Notes

Delayed application of Law 5-156: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 7-1901.